West Virginia, session 2025, HB2891.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION. §18-2-7h. Required community service hours as prerequisite to graduation. (a) The Legislature finds and declares that students who perform community service contribute to both their own well-being, as well as the improvement of the community overall.(b) As a prerequisite to graduation, all high school students shall complete at least 20 hours of community service before receiving his or her high school diploma.(c) The state board shall compile a list of approved community service activities to provide to county boards of education: Provided, That students may apply for activities to be included as community service upon approval by the school, the county board, or state board.